Hawaii statutes.
§171-13 Disposition of public lands.
Except as otherwise provided by law and subject to other provisions of this
chapter, the board may:

(1) Dispose of public land in fee simple, by lease,
lease with option to purchase, license, or permit; and

(2) Grant easement by direct negotiation or otherwise
for particular purposes in perpetuity on such terms as may be set by the board,
subject to reverter to the State upon termination or abandonment of the
specific purpose for which it was granted, provided the sale price of such
easement shall be determined pursuant to section 171-17(b).

No person shall be eligible to purchase or lease
public lands, or to be granted a license, permit, or easement covering public
lands, who has had during the five years preceding the date of disposition a
previous sale, lease, license, permit, or easement covering public lands
canceled for failure to satisfy the terms and conditions thereof. [L 1962, c
32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-13; HRS §171-13; am L 1973, c 205, §1; am L 1976, c 193,
§1; am L 1980, c 4, §1; am L 1983, c 25, §1; am L Sp 2001 3d, c 15, §§12, 13;
am L 2002, c 69, §1]

Note

Relief for airport concessionaires (repealed July 1, 2013).
L Sp 2009, c 33; L 2011, c 104, §2.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next